Tennessee, session 114, SB2244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-5-103(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "period of five (5) years or more" and substituting "period of six (6) years or more".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to dental hygienist members appointed to the board of dentistry on or after that date.
SB2244
012662
- 1 -